District of Columbia statutes.
19-1507

Disclaimer of rights of survivorship in jointly held property.

(a)

Upon the death of a holder of jointly held property, a surviving holder may disclaim, in whole or part, the greater of:

(1)

A fractional share of the property determined by dividing the number one by the number of joint holders alive immediately before the death of the holder to whose death the disclaimer relates; or

(2)

All of the property except that part of the value of the entire interest attributable to the contribution furnished by the disclaimant.

(b)

A disclaimer under subsection (a) of this section takes effect as of the death of the holder of jointly held property to whose death the disclaimer relates.

(c)

An interest in jointly held property disclaimed by a surviving holder of the property passes as if the disclaimant predeceased the holder to whose death the disclaimer relates.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-205, § 2(b), 53 DCR 9063
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (1999).
This section is referenced in § 19-1506.